Virginia statutes. Title 59.1. Trade and Commerce.
Article 1. Building Fixtures.

§ 59.1-116.1.
Definitions.

As used in this article, unless the context requires a different meaning:

“Authorized scrap metal purchaser” has the same meaning as provided for the term “scrap metal purchaser ” in § 59.1-136.1.

“Authorized scrap seller” means any licensed plumber, electrical contractor, HVAC contractor, or building and construction contractor.

“Building material” means any secondhand heating or plumbing fixture or supplies, electric fixtures, or any wiring, gas fixtures or appliances, water faucets, pipes, locks, or any other secondhand fixtures of any kind or description used in the construction
of a building.

“Junk dealer” means a person who regularly engages in the business of purchasing, acquiring, or canvassing secondhand building material, including all nonferrous scrap metal, proprietary articles, or both, for the purpose of resale and has conducted transactions
involving, or has offered for sale, more than 600 pounds combined weight of secondhand building material or enters into more than 26 combined transactions annually. “Junk dealer” does not include a “scrap metal purchaser” as defined
in § 59.1-136.1.

“Person” means any individual, corporation, partnership, association, cooperative, limited liability company, trust, joint venture, or other private commercial entity.

“Regularly engaged” with respect to purchasing or acquiring secondhand building material means having conducted transactions involving, or having offered for sale, more than 600 pounds combined weight of secondhand building material or enters into more
than 26 combined transactions annually.

History.
2011, c. 836; 2013, c. 414.

The 2013 amendments.

The 2013 amendment by c. 414 substituted “purchaser” for “processor” twice in the paragraph defining “Authorized scrap metal purchaser,” and in the paragraph defining “Junk dealer.”

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see
8B M.J. Fixtures, § 14.

§ 59.1-117.
Permit required for trading in secondhand building fixtures.

Except as otherwise provided in this chapter, no person shall offer for sale or acquire any secondhand heating or plumbing fixtures or supplies, electric fixtures or any wiring, gas fixtures or appliances, water faucets, pipes, locks, bathtubs, gutters,
downspouts, or other secondhand fixtures of whatever kind or description pertaining to a building or structure, without first obtaining a permit for the sale or acquisition of the same from the chief of police of the city or town or
the sheriff of the county in which such property is offered for sale or acquisition.

History.
Code 1950, § 59-145; 1968, c. 439; 2010, c. 805; 2011, c. 836; 2013, c. 414.

The 2010 amendments.

The 2010 amendment by c. 805 inserted “gutters, downspouts.”

The 2011 amendments.

The 2011 amendment by c. 836 deleted “firm or corporation” following “no person,” substituted “acquire” for “sell” and inserted “any” preceding “wiring,” inserted “or structure” and “or acquisition.”

The 2013 amendments.

The 2013 amendment by c. 414 added “or acquisition” at the end.

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see
3C M.J. Commercial Law, § 2.

§ 59.1-118.
Permit issued by chief of police or sheriff; revocation.

The chief of police of a city or the sheriff of a county may issue, to persons regularly engaged in the business of collecting secondhand building materials for resale, a semiannual or annual permit covering all sales and acquisitions made by such persons.
The chief of police or sheriff may refuse to issue a permit, and may revoke any permit issued, to any person convicted of a felony or crime of moral turpitude within the three years prior to the request for the permit. The applicant
shall file with the chief of police or sheriff, or his designee, an application form that shall include the applicant’s full name, address, age, sex, and fingerprints; the name, address, and telephone number of the applicant’s employer,
if any; and the location of the applicant’s place of business. A permit shall be valid for one year from the date of issuance and may be renewed in the same manner as such permit was initially obtained. A fee of not more than $50 may
be charged annually for the issuance of the permit.

History.
Code 1950, § 59-146; 1968, c. 439; 2011, c. 836.

The 2011 amendments.

The 2011 amendment by c. 836, in the first sentence, inserted “building” and “and acquisitions”; in the second sentence, substituted “convicted of a felony or crime of moral turpitude within three years prior to the request for the permit” for “convicted
of stealing or receiving stolen goods”; added the third and fourth sentences; and rewrote the last sentence, which read: “No charge shall be made for any such permit.”

§ 59.1-119.
Who deemed a dealer.

Every person who is regularly engaged in the purchasing or acquiring of secondhand building material of the kind mentioned in § 59.1-117 for the purpose of resale or installation on the property of another shall be deemed a dealer within the meaning of
the provisions of this article.

History.
Code 1950, § 59-147; 1968, c. 439; 2011, c. 836.

The 2011 amendments.

The 2011 amendment by c. 836 substituted “who purchases secondhand property” for “who is regularly engaged in the purchasing or acquiring of secondhand building material.”

§ 59.1-119.1.
Dealer required to show permit and identification.

Every dealer making a sale or purchase of a secondhand fixture pursuant to the provisions of this article shall first display the permit required by § 59.1-117 and also display positive photo identification to the purchaser or seller of such fixture.

History.
1992, c. 25.

§ 59.1-120.
Recordkeeping requirements.

At the time of purchasing, collecting, receiving, or acquiring a secondhand building fixture, the dealer shall be required to provide:

The date and time of the secondhand building fixture’s acquisition; and

The address from which the property was acquired and, if available, a driver’s license or other form of government identification to include the name and date of birth of the person from whom the material was collected.

Every dealer shall keep at his place of business a permanently bound book or ledger in which shall be legibly written with ink in English at the time of each transaction in the course of the dealer’s transaction involving a secondhand building fixture
that is collected, received, acquired, or purchased by the dealer. Such account shall set forth:

A complete and accurate description of the secondhand building fixture that is the subject of the transaction;

All information prescribed in subsection A regarding location and, if available, the name and date of birth of the person with whom the dealer conducts the transaction;

The license number of the automobile or other vehicle in which the secondhand building fixture was delivered or received; and

The number of the permit issued pursuant to § 59.1-118 by the chief of police of the city or town, or the sheriff of the county, in which the transaction involving a secondhand building fixture occurred.

Records required by subsection B shall be maintained by the dealer at its normal place of business or at another readily accessible and secure location for a period of 24 months.

History.
Code 1950, § 59-148; 1968, c. 439; 2010, c. 805; 2011, c. 836.

The 2010 amendments.

The 2010 amendment by c. 805 designated previously existing provisions as subsection B and added subsection A; in subsection B, substituted “ledger” for “books,” and “purchase and sale” for “purchase and/or sale” in the first sentence, substituted “and
other information prescribed in subdivision A 1 regarding” for “residence and description of” and inserted “the time and date of the transaction” in the second sentence, and added the last sentence.

The 2011 amendments.

The 2011 amendment by c. 836 rewrote the section.

§ 59.1-121.
Reports to be made to chief of police or sheriff.

Every junk dealer selling or acquiring secondhand building materials of the kind mentioned in § 59.1-117, including persons regularly engaged in the business of collecting or acquiring secondhand building materials for the purpose of resale to a scrap
metal purchaser, shall deliver:

If the purchase, acquisition, or receipt of the secondhand building fixture occurred in a city or town, to the chief of police of the city or town in which such goods were bought, collected, or received, every day except Sunday before noon, on blank forms
to be prescribed and furnished by the chief of police of such city or town:

A legible and accurate description of every secondhand building fixture purchased, acquired, or received by him during the next preceding business day;

The date and time of the secondhand building fixture’s acquisition;

If the person is a dealer, the number of his permit issued pursuant to § 59.1-118;

The license number of any automobile or other vehicle in which the secondhand building fixture was collected or received;

If available, the name and date of birth of the person with whom the dealer conducted the transaction; and

If the person is a dealer, a reference to the volume and number of the page where the original entry required by subsection B of § 59.1-120 is made; or

If the purchase, acquisition, or receipt of the secondhand building fixture occurred in a county, the same information required by subdivision 1 shall be furnished to the sheriff of the county in which such goods were bought, collected, or received not
later than midday of the Saturday following the purchase or receipt of such goods, but the sheriff shall not be required to prepare or furnish blank forms for such reports for use in the county, and the dealer may submit any report
which fairly conforms to the requirements of subdivision 1.

History.
Code 1950, § 59-149; 1968, c. 439; 1972, c. 598; 2010, c. 805; 2011, c. 836; 2013, c. 414.

The 2010 amendments.

The 2010 amendment by c. 805 added subsection B.

The 2011 amendments.

The 2011 amendment by c. 836 rewrote the section.

The 2013 amendments.

The 2013 amendment by c. 414 substituted “scrap metal purchaser” for “scrap metal processor” in the introductory paragraph.

§ 59.1-122.
Books and places of business open to inspection.

The books required by this article to be kept, and the places of business of all persons engaged in the acquiring, selling, receiving, or purchasing of the articles mentioned in § 59.1-117, shall at all reasonable times be open to the inspection of any
police officer, sheriff, or deputy of the county, city, or town in which such place of business is located.

History.
Code 1950, § 59-150; 1968, c. 439; 2011, c. 836.

The 2011 amendments.

The 2011 amendment by c. 836 substituted “persons engaged in the acquiring, selling, receiving, or purchasing” for “persons engaged in the sale, receiving, or purchasing.”

§ 59.1-123.
Exemptions from article.

The provisions of this article shall not apply to:

The sale of secondhand material mentioned in § 59.1-117 taken from premises occupied by the owner, when sold by such owner on the premises, or the sale of such articles when purchased from a public utility corporation at its place of business or a governmental
agency;

Scrap metal purchasers as provided in Article 4 (§ 59.1-136.1 et seq.);

Authorized scrap sellers;

Public utilities;

Public transportation companies;

Peddlers permitted under § 59.1-118;

Industrial and manufacturing companies;

Marine, automobile, and aircraft salvage and wrecking companies;

Governmental entities; or

The donation of secondhand material mentioned in § 59.1-117 by the material’s owner or the owner’s contractor or subcontractor to a nonprofit corporation as defined in § 501(c)(3) of the U.S. Internal Revenue Code or the sale of such donated material
by such a nonprofit corporation.

History.
Code 1950, § 59-151; 1968, c. 439; 2007, c. 917; 2011, c. 836; 2013, c. 414; 2015, c. 626.

The 2007 amendments.

The 2007 amendment by c. 917 rewrote the section.

The 2011 amendments.

The 2011 amendment by c. 836, in subdivision 1, substituted “material” for “materials” and “utility” for “utilities”; and added subdivisions 3 through 9 and made a related change.

The 2013 amendments.

The 2013 amendment by c. 414 substituted “purchasers” for “processors” in subdivision 2; and substituted “Peddlers permitted under § 59.1-118” for “Licensed peddlers and brokers” in subdivision 6.

The 2015 amendments.

The 2015 amendment by c. 626 added subdivision 10 and made related changes.

§ 59.1-124.
Penalty for violation.

Any person who violates this article shall be guilty of a Class 3 misdemeanor. A person convicted of a second or subsequent offense under this article is guilty of a Class 1 misdemeanor.

History.
Code 1950, § 59-152; 1968, c. 439; 1972, c. 598; 1988, c. 765; 2010, c. 805.

Cross references.

As to punishment for Class 1 and Class 3 misdemeanors, see §

18.2-11

.

The 2010 amendments.

The 2010 amendment by c. 805 rewrote the section.